Massachusetts, session 194th, H4385.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
To amend the Town Charter, Section C-5-2 ALTERNATIVE OR ASSOCIATE
MEMBERS, as follows:
Proposed addition(s) in bold or underscored:
Notwithstanding any general special law to the contrary, the select board may appoint not
more than two associate or alternate members to each multi-member body elected under this
charter, other than the school committee and the housing authority, or otherwise authorized by
the General Laws. The alternate or associate members shall be appointed for a term of 1 year.
Alternate or associate members may participate in any and all matters pending before such body.
And:
The chairman of each multi-member body may designate an associate or alternate
member to temporarily sit as a full member on the multiple-member body in the event of
of 2

absence, inability to act or conflict of interest in the part of any member of the body or in the
event of a vacancy on the body.
Or take any other action relative thereon or in relation thereto.
of 2